Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2720
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-2701 to 44-2720 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 21;

Laws 1986, LB 593, § 16.